Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1718.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52FLOOD INSURANCE NOTIFICATIONSec.5201. Purpose of chapter.5202. Definitions.5203. Duties of insurers.5204. Duties of department SURPLUS LINES LICENSEES . 5205. Enforcement REGULATIONS . 5206. Penalties.§ 5201. Purpose of chapter.<--<--123456789101112131415161718 The purpose of this chapter is to require insurers to inform individuals purchasing or renewing a homeowner's insurance policy of the availability and cost of flood insurance coverage to ensure that individuals are informed of the potential risks and availability and cost of flood insurance coverage. AND SURPLUS LINES LICENSEES TO SHARE INFORMATION ABOUT FLOOD RISKS AND FLOOD INSURANCE WITH INDIVIDUALS PURCHASING OR RENEWING A HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY.§ 5202. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth."Flood insurance policy ." An insurance policy which provides coverage for damage to real or personal property that is caused by flooding A NATURAL FLOOD EVENT . "Homeowner's insurance policy." An insurance policy which provides coverage for damage to real or personal property should an event considered a covered loss occur. Homeowner's insurance policies may be required by a mortgage lender. The term does not include flood insurance."HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY." A POLICY OF INSURANCE COVERING AN OWNER-OCCUPIED PRIVATE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY THAT DOES NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR DAMAGE CAUSED BY A NATURAL FLOOD EVENT."Insurer." An entity licensed by the department that offers, issues or renews a homeowner's insurance policy."Mortgage lender." As defined in 7 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions)."NATURAL FLOOD EVENT." A GENERAL AND TEMPORARY CONDITION OF 20250HB1718PN2822 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARTIAL OR COMPLETE INUNDATION OF TWO OR MORE ACRES OF NORMALLY DRY LAND AREA OR OF TWO OR MORE PARCELS OF REAL PROPERTY, AT LEAST ONE OF WHICH IS THE SUBJECT PROPERTY, FROM ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) OVERFLOW OF INLAND OR TIDAL WATERS.(2) UNUSUAL AND RAPID ACCUMULATION OR RUNOFF OF SURFACE WATERS FROM ANY SOURCE.(3) MUDFLOW.(4) COLLAPSE OR SUBSIDENCE OF LAND ALONG THE SHORE OF A LAKE OR SIMILAR BODY OF WATER AS A RESULT OF EROSION OR UNDERMINING CAUSED BY WAVES OR CURRENTS OF WATER EXCEEDING ANTICIPATED CYCLICAL LEVELS."SURPLUS LINES HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY." A HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY ISSUED BY A NONADMITTED INSURER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1602 OF THE ACT OF MAY 17, 1921 (P.L.682, NO.284), KNOWN AS THE INSURANCE COMPANY LAW OF 1921."S URPLUS LINES LICENSEE." A PERSON LICENSED AS A SURPLUS LINES PRODUCER UNDER SECTION 1615 OF THE INSURANCE COMPANY LAW OF 1921 TO PLACE SURPLUS LINES INSURANCE WITH NONADMITTED INSURERS ELIGIBLE TO ACCEPT THE INSURANCE.§ 5203. Duties of insurers.(a) Notice.--Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, DISCLOSURE REQUIRED.--SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B), an insurer that issues or renews a homeowner's insurance policy in this Commonwealth shall, contemporaneously with the issuance or renewal of the policy, provide written notice to the policyholder regarding the availability of flood insurance. Written notice under this section shall be provided via mail or electronic communication.(b) Contents.--The communication provided under this section 20250HB1718PN2822 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 must be sent in a stand-alone manner and not with any other documents or policy-related materials.§ 5204. Duties of department.(a) Model disclosure.--The department shall create and distribute a model disclosure form that insurers may use for the purpose of notifying an individual purchasing or renewing a homeowner's insurance policy of the ability to purchase flood insurance. The form provided by the department shall include:(1) A statement indicating that homeowner's insurance policies do not typically include flood insurance.(2) A general explanation of the potential risk of flooding, even outside of official flood zones.(3) Information on the availability of flood insurance through the National Flood Insurance Program or private insurers, including that some flood insurance policies, including those issued through the National Flood Insurance Program, have a 30-day waiting period before coverage is effective.(4) The benefits of purchasing a flood insurance policy, including that flood insurance may allow an individual to receive higher claim payments than they would otherwise receive through disaster assistance, and some individuals may be able to receive both.(5) An estimate of the cost of obtaining flood insurance for the property for which the individual is purchasing or renewing a homeowner's insurance policy for, or guidance on how to obtain an estimate.(6) Any other information the department deems necessary to ensure that an individual purchasing or renewing a homeowner's insurance policy is notified of the purpose of 20250HB1718PN2822 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 flood insurance and the ability to purchase a flood insurance policy.(b) Information required.--An insurer who chooses not to use the model disclosure form provided by the department shall include the information required under this section in the written notice required to be provided under section 5203 (relating to duties of insurers).(B) METHODS OF COMPLIANCE.--(1) AN INSURER MAY COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION BY PROVIDING A DISCLOSURE THAT COMPLIES WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OR (3).(2) A N INSURER MAY PROVIDE THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) USING A FORM THAT IS DEVELOPED BY THE INSURER AND THAT CONTAINS AT LEAST THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:(I) A STATEMENT INDICATING THAT THE HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY DOES NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR FLOOD LOSS.(II) A STATEMENT INDICATING THAT FLOODING IS POSSIBLE ANYWHERE, EVEN OUTSIDE OFFICIAL FLOOD ZONES.(III) A STATEMENT INDICATING THAT COVERAGE MAY BE AVAILABLE THROUGH THE NATIONAL FLOOD INSURANCE PROGRAM.(IV) A STATEMENT INFORMING THE INSURED THAT THE INSURED MAY VISIT THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE FOR MORE INFORMATION ON FLOOD INSURANCE.(3) AN INSURER MAY PROVIDE THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) BY USING THE FOLLOWING MODEL FORM:PLEASE READ: IMPORTANT INFORMATION ON FLOOD INSURANCEMANY PROPERTIES IN PENNSYLVANIA ARE EXPERIENCING INCREASED RISKS REGARDING FLOODING, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE PROPERTY IS IN AN OFFICIAL FLOOD ZONE OR 20250HB1718PN2822 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NOT. YOU ARE ENCOURAGED TO VISIT THE PENNSYLVANIA INSURANCE DEPARTMENT'S WEBSITE TO REVIEW INFORMATION REGARDING FLOOD-RELATED RISK FACTORS. A STANDARD HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY TYPICALLY DOES NOT COVER DAMAGE CAUSED BY FLOODING. YOU ARE ENCOURAGED TO SPEAK WITH AN INSURANCE PROFESSIONAL ABOUT WHETHER YOU ARE COVERED FOR DAMAGE CAUSED BY FLOODING. IF YOU ARE NOT ALREADY COVERED FOR DAMAGE CAUSED BY FLOODING, COVERAGE MAY BE AVAILABLE FROM AN INSURANCE COMPANY OR THROUGH THE NATIONAL FLOOD INSURANCE PROGRAM.(C) METHOD OF TRANSMISSION.--AN INSURER SHALL TRANSMIT THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION THROUGH PHYSICAL MAIL OR AN ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION.(D) C ONTENTS.-- (1) THE DISCLOSURE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE DELIVERED ALONGSIDE THE HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY OR OTHER POLICY-RELATED DOCUMENTS.(2) THE DISCLOSURE SHALL BE ON ITS OWN PAGE IN 16-POINT FONT.(3) AN INSURER MAY PRINT THE DISCLOSURE ON COLORED PAPER.(4) AN INSURER MAY DELIVER THE DISCLOSURE THROUGH A SEPARATE DOCUMENT THAT IS NOT BOUND TO THE POLICY OR OTHER POLICY-RELATED DOCUMENTS.(E) EXEMPTION.--AN INSURER IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY PROVIDES FLOOD INSURANCE, INCLUDING THROUGH A RIDER OR ENDORSEMENT.§ 5204. DUTIES OF SURPLUS LINES LICENSEES.20250HB1718PN2822 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) DISCLOSURE REQUIRED.--A SURPLUS LINES LICENSEE THAT PLACES A SURPLUS LINES HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY SHALL, CONTEMPORANEOUSLY WITH THE PLACEMENT OF THE POLICY, INFORM THE PROSPECTIVE INSURED OF WHETHER THE SURPLUS LINES HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR FLOOD DAMAGE.( B) METHOD OF DISCLOSURE.--THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE PROVIDED IN WRITING.§ 5205. Enforcement REGULATIONS . The department shall enforce the provision of this chapter and may promulgate rules and regulations as necessary AND APPROPRIATE to implement the provisions of this chapter. § 5206. Penalties.The Insurance Commissioner may impose a penalty of no more than $10,000 $500 for each A violation of this chapter. PENALTIES UNDER THIS CHAPTER AGAINST A VIOLATOR MAY NOT EXCEED $25,000 IN A CALENDAR YEAR.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1718PN2822 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617